Arkansas, session 2025, SB423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-317. Nonprofit volunteer service organization education award.
There is allowed an exemption from the individual income tax imposed by
this chapter for an education scholarship, award, or grant received by a
resident and awarded by a nonprofit volunteer service organization to:
(1) Pay for the taxpayer's attendance at an institution of
higher education;
(2) Pay for the taxpayer's educational or vocational training;
or
(3) Repay a taxpayer's student loan.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.
*JLL271*
03/11/2025 10:37:58 AM JLL271